Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 16 Licensing Construction of Bomb Shelters

30-16-1.
Written statement as to degree of protection afforded.

No contract or agreement for the sale or construction of a bomb shelter, so-called, shall be valid unless, before the time of the making of the contract or agreement, the seller, builder, or erector shall have delivered a written statement in the English language to the purchaser in a form approved by the state department of transportation, fully setting forth the degree of protection afforded by that bomb shelter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1942, ch. 1151, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-16-1

.

30-16-2.
Registration of bomb shelter builders — Permit.

Each seller, builder, and/or erector of bomb shelters, so-called, shall register his or her name and place of business with the state department of transportation and furnish it with the specifications of those bomb shelters and a copy of the statement referred to in §

30-16-1

, and if the department finds that if those specifications are followed the bomb shelter will afford the degree of protection claimed in that statement, then the department shall issue to that seller, builder, and/or erector, as the case may be, a permit to sell, build, and/or erect the bomb shelter described in those specifications.

History of Section.

P.L. 1942, ch. 1151, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

30-16-2

.

30-16-3.
Penalty for violations.

Any person, firm, or corporation selling, building, or erecting a bomb shelter, so-called, without first having obtained a permit issued under the provisions of this chapter or violating any other provision of this chapter, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and punished by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment not exceeding one year, or both, at the discretion of the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1942, ch. 1151, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

30-16-3

.

30-16-4.
Powers of inspector of buildings.

In cities and towns having an inspector of buildings, the powers, duties, and prerogatives given to the state department of transportation by this chapter shall be exercised and performed by that inspector of buildings, without reference in any manner to the state department of transportation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1942, ch. 1151, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

30-16-4

.